Maryland, session 2026, SB0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 23–802 through 23–812 of Article – Education of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 23–803 through 23–813, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
23–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Employee” means a full–time or part–time employee of the library.
(2) “Employee” does not include a confidential employee[,] OR
management employee[, or supervisory employee].
(k) “Management employee” means an employee who generally has authority and
who:
(1) Formulates policy that is applicable throughout a bargaining unit;
(2) Has a significant role in personnel administration, employee relations,
or the preparation and administration of budgets for the employer; or
(3) May reasonably be required to:
(i) Assist directly in the preparation for and conduct of collective
bargaining negotiations on behalf of the employer; or
(ii) Have a major role in the administration of resulting collective
bargaining agreements.
(l) “Supervisory employee” means an employee who is authorized to:
(1) Hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign,
reward, or discipline employees;
(2) Responsibly direct employees for more than 50% of the employee’s
working hours; or
(3) Address and resolve the grievances of employees.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 756
23–802.
(A) THERE MAY NOT BE MORE THAN TWO BARGAINING UNITS ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) ONE BARGAINING UNIT FOR EMPLOYEES WHO ARE NOT
SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES; AND
(2) ONE BARGAINING UNIT FOR SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO MODIFY OR TERMINATE:
(1) A BARGAINING UNIT THAT WAS RECOGNIZED OR IN EXISTENCE ON
OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026; OR
(2) A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO ON OR
BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026.
23–803.
(a) An employee who may effectively recommend an action listed in [§ 23–801(l)]
§ 23–801(K) of this subtitle may be deemed a [supervisory] MANAGEMENT employee if
the employee’s exercise of the authority requires the exercise of independent judgment and
is not merely of a routine or clerical nature.
(b) The exercise of any single function listed in [§ 23–801(l)] § 23–801(K) of this
subtitle may not necessarily require the conclusion that the individual exercising that
function is in fact a [supervisory] MANAGEMENT employee within the meaning of the
definition.
(c) In differentiating a [supervisory] MANAGEMENT employee from a
[nonsupervisory] NONMANAGEMENT employee:
(1) A class title alone may not be the basis for determination; and
(2) The nature of the [supervisory] MANAGEMENT employee’s work,
including whether or not a significant portion of the [supervisory] MANAGEMENT
employee’s working time is spent as part of a team that includes [nonsupervisory]
NONMANAGEMENT employees shall be considered.
23–810.
– 3 –

Ch. 756 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Board shall submit a term of a collective bargaining agreement or
memorandum of understanding entered into under [§§ 23–807 and 23–808] §§ 23–808
AND 23–809 of this subtitle to the County Executive with the Board’s recommendation
regarding whether the agreement or the mediator’s decision requires an appropriation of
additional funds.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –